Utah statutes.
62A-7-507.   Appeal regarding parole release or revocation.

(1)  A youth offender, or the parent or legal guardian of a youth offender, may appeal to the executive director or his designee any decision of the authority regarding parole release, rescission, or revocation.

(2)  The executive director or his designee may set aside or remand the authority's decision only if it is arbitrary, capricious, an abuse of discretion, or contrary to law.

